District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2001

Definitions.

Repealed.

June 7, 1938, 52 Stat. 611, ch. 321, § 1
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245,§ 38(b), 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-901.
1973 Ed. § 2-1301.

Prior Codifications

Repeal of Law 9-245

Section 1236 of D.C. Law 12-261 transfers authority to the Board of Barber and Cosmetology established by § 47-2853.6 [§ 47-2853.06, 2001 Ed.].

Repeal of Law